Maryland, session 2025, HB0835.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
18–102.
This title applies only in Charles County.
18–1001.
(a) There is a Class B–Stadium (baseball stadium) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(b) The Board may issue the license to:
(1) the owner of a professional team franchise, whether the franchise is a
partnership, corporation, or limited liability company; or
(2) a private concessionaire that is under contract with the county or a
professional baseball team franchise.
– 1 –

Ch. 784 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) (1) The license authorizes the license holder to sell beer, wine, and liquor
on the premises of a baseball stadium owned or operated by the county, EXCLUDING ANY
PARKING AREAS, to individuals present at a baseball game or other event held at the
stadium.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, beer,
wine, and liquor shall be served in plastic, [Styrofoam, or] paper, OR OTHER NONGLASS
containers on the stadium premises.
(ii) Beer, wine, and liquor may be served in glass containers in an
enclosed stadium dining area in which patrons are seated.
(3) A patron[:
(i)] may consume and carry beer [and], wine, AND LIQUOR
anywhere on the stadium premises, EXCLUDING ANY PARKING AREAS[; but
(ii) 1. may consume liquor only in an enclosed stadium dining
area or bar; and
2. may not carry liquor out of the enclosed stadium dining
area or bar].
(4) The license holder may not allow an individual to carry alcoholic
beverages onto or from the licensed premises.
(d) Except as provided in regulations adopted under subsection (e) of this section,
the license holder may sell beer, wine, and liquor during the hours and days as set out for
a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license under § 18–2004 of this title.
(e) The Board may adopt regulations relating to:
(1) the manner of serving alcoholic beverages;
(2) the number of outlets authorized to serve alcoholic beverages; and
(3) the hours and days of sale.
(f) The annual license fee is $2,200.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –